California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) The board shall notify both the registrant and the dean of the medical school, or the dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center, of a complaint made about the registrant. The board may terminate a registration for any act that would be grounds for discipline if done by a licensee. The board shall provide both the registrant and the dean of the medical school, or the dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center, with written notice of the termination and the basis for that termination. The registrant may, within 30 days after the date of the notice of termination, file a written appeal
 to the board. The appeal shall include any documentation the registrant wishes to present to the board.

(i) A registrant granted a certificate of registration before January 1, 2021, to engage in the practice of medicine pursuant to this section at an academic medical center shall be deemed to be authorized at that academic medical center as though the initial application had been sponsored by the academic medical center.

(j) As used in this section, “academic medical center” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2168.

(k) The certificate of registration authorized by this section may be canceled in the following circumstances:

(1) Upon request by the certificate holder.

(2) Upon request by an authorized representative of the sponsoring facility or institution.

(3) By the board after the certificate has expired and is no longer eligible for renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 6.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Licensed Physicians from Mexico Program [2125. - 2126.]

2125.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board” means the Medical Board of California.

(2) “Program” means the Licensed Physicians from Mexico Program.

(b) (1) The Licensed Physicians from Mexico Program is hereby created.

(2) The board shall approve physician candidates from Mexico for program participation.

(c) (1) This program extends the physician component of the Licensed
 Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program, as
 established in former Section 853, which authorized up to 30 licensed physicians specializing in family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, and obstetrics and gynecology from Mexico to practice medicine in California for a period not to exceed three years.

(2) The program shall also maintain an alternate list of program participants.

(d) The board shall issue a nonrenewable three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license to each licensed physician from Mexico who meets the criteria set forth in this section.

(e) Each physician from Mexico, to be eligible to participate in this program, shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be
 licensed, certified or recertified, and in good standing in their medical specialty in Mexico. This certification or
 recertification shall be performed, as appropriate, by the Consejo Mexicano de Ginecología y Obstetricia, A.C., the Consejo Mexicano de Certificación en Medicina Familiar, A.C., the Consejo Mexicano de Medicina Interna, A.C., the Consejo Mexicano de Certificación en Pediatría, A.C., or the Consejo Mexicano de Psiquiatría, A.C.

(2) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for a physician’s and surgeon’s license, as defined by this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of
 Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) and Section 2221.

(3) Before leaving Mexico, have completed all of the following requirements:

(A) Passed an interview examination developed by the National Autonomous University of Mexico (UNAM) for each specialty area. Each family practitioner who includes obstetrics and gynecology in their practice and shall not perform deliveries in California unless they have performed 50 live birth deliveries, as required by United States standards, confirmed by written documentation by the supervising department chair, hospital administrator, or hospital chief medical officer. Each obstetrician and
 gynecologist from Mexico shall be a fellow in good standing of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.

(B) (i) Satisfactorily completed an orientation program approved by the board in connection with the Licensed Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program, as established in former Section 853, and that includes medical protocol, community clinic history and operations, medical administration, hospital operations and protocol, medical ethics, the California medical delivery system, health maintenance organizations and managed care practices, medication documentation and reconciliation, the electronic medical records system utilized by federally qualified health centers, and standards for medical record documentation to support medical decisionmaking and quality care. This orientation program may be
 changed by a committee of at least five chief medical officers at federally qualified health centers employing program licensees to ensure that the orientation program contains the requisite subject matter and meets appropriate California law and medical standards where applicable.

(ii) Satisfactorily completed the Test of English as a Foreign Language by scoring a minimum of 85 or the Occupational English Test with a minimum score of 350, and provided written documentation of their completion to the board.

(C) Representatives from California and the UNAM in Mexico that executed and implemented the provisions of the former Licensed Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program shall be the
 points of contact involved in securing required documents, recruiting and vetting candidates, assisting candidates for this program in Mexico to meet all program requirements, selecting appropriate federally qualified health centers throughout California, ensuring compliance with program provisions, developing policy and clinical workshops, monitoring productivity and increased access to medical care, and assessing the necessity of policy and programmatic improvements.

(4) Upon satisfactory completion of the requirements in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and after having received their nonrenewable three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license, each licensee shall be required to obtain continuing education pursuant to Section 2190. Each physician shall obtain 25 continuing education units per year for three years of program participation, which
 shall be subject to random audits by the board to ensure compliance. The board may issue a citation and administrative fine against a licensee who fails to comply with the requirements of this paragraph.

(5) The federally qualified health centers employing physicians from Mexico shall continue the peer review protocols and procedures as required by the federal government. The federally qualified health centers shall work with a California medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 or a residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education to conduct 10 secondary reviews of randomly selected patient encounters with each licensee per six-month period, and the reviews shall be transmitted to the approved medical school or medical institution with an approved residency program in PDF format.
 The secondary reviews shall be undertaken every six months of each year for the three years that the physicians from Mexico are employed by federally qualified health centers. The faculty reviewers in family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, psychiatry, and obstetrics and gynecology from the California medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 or the residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education shall provide feedback to the federally qualified health centers of the findings of their secondary reviews. The faculty and federally qualified health center chief medical officers shall jointly develop no less than two quality assurance (QA) seminars for all physicians from Mexico to attend during the six months of secondary reviews conducted. The purpose of the approved medical school or medical institution with an approved residency
 program secondary peer reviews shall be to provide feedback on compliance with medical standards, protocols, and procedures required by the federal government and assessed by the monthly or quarterly peer reviews conducted by federally qualified health centers. The associated costs for the secondary reviews and QA seminars shall be the responsibility of the federally qualified health centers on a pro rata basis.

(6) The federally qualified health centers employing physicians in the program shall be required to have medical quality assurance protocols and be accredited by The Joint Commission, National Committee for Quality Assurance, or Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care.

(7) Participating hospitals shall have the authority to establish criteria necessary to allow
 individuals participating in this program to be granted hospital privileges in their facilities, taking into consideration the need and concerns for access to patient populations served by federally qualified health centers and attending doctors from Mexico, especially in rural areas that do not have hospitals staffed to provide deliveries of newborns.

(8) A licensee shall practice only in the nonprofit community health center that offered the licensee employment and the corresponding hospital. This three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license shall be deemed to be a license in good standing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of participation and reimbursement in all federal, state, and local health programs. These programs shall include the Medicare Program, the fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems of the
 Medi-Cal program, and private insurance. A physician from Mexico shall not be denied credentials by a health plan because the physician is a participant in this state program and did not receive their medical education and training in the United States. The nonrenewable three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license issued pursuant to this program shall be referred to as a Physician’s and Surgeon’s from Mexico License and shall not include any additional notations beyond the current numerical identifiers that the board applies.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 30, the board shall issue a nonrenewable three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license pursuant to this section to an applicant who has not provided an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number
 if the board staff determines the applicant is otherwise eligible for a license only under the program pursuant to this section, subject to the following conditions:

(A) The applicant shall immediately seek both an appropriate three-year visa and the accompanying social security number from the United States government within 14 days of being issued a medical license under this section.

(B) The applicant shall immediately provide to the board a social security number obtained in accordance with subparagraph (A) within 10 days of the federal government issuing the social security card related to the issued visa.

(C) The applicant shall not engage in the practice of medicine pursuant to this section until the board
 determines that the conditions in subparagraphs (A) and (B) have been met.

(2) The board, if it determines that an applicant has met the conditions in paragraph (1), shall notify the applicant that the applicant may engage in the practice of medicine under the license in accordance with this section.

(g) (1) (A) Between January 1, 2025, and January 1, 2029, the board shall coordinate with the representatives described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to ensure that no more than 155 program participants have a current and active license at the same time.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), no more than 30 of the 155 licenses may be
 issued to physicians whose primary area of practice is psychiatry.

(C) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall submit an application to the board between October 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, except that the board may accept up to 15 applications after July 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2028.

(2) (A) Between January 1, 2029, and January 1, 2033, the board shall coordinate with the representatives described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to ensure that no more than 195 program participants have a current and active license at the same time.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), no more than 40 of the 195 licenses may
 be issued to physicians whose primary area of practice is psychiatry.

(C) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall submit an application to the board between October 1, 2029, and December 31, 2029, except that the board may accept up to 19 applications after December 31, 2029, and before January 1, 2032.

(3) (A) Between January 1, 2033, and January 1, 2037, the board shall coordinate with the representatives described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to ensure that no more than 225 program participants have a current and active license at the same time.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), no more than 40 of the 225
 licenses may be issued to physicians whose primary area of practice is psychiatry.

(C) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall submit an application to the board between October 1, 2033, and December 31, 2033, except that the board may accept up to 22 applications after December 31, 2033, and before January 1, 2036.

(4) (A) Between January 1, 2037, and January 1, 2041, the board shall coordinate with the representatives described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to ensure that no more than 255 program participants have a current and active license at the same time.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), no more than 40
 of the 255 licenses may be issued to physicians whose primary area of practice is psychiatry.

(C) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall submit an application to the board between October 1, 2037, and December 31, 2037, except that the board may accept up to 25 applications after December 31, 2037, and before January 1, 2040.

(5) (A) Between January 1, 2041, and January 1, 2045, the board shall coordinate with the representatives described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to ensure that no more than 275 program participants have a current and active license at the same time.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), no more
 than 40 of the 275 licenses may be issued to physicians whose primary area of practice is psychiatry.

(C) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall submit an application to the board between October 1, 2041, and December 31, 2041, except that the board may accept up to 27 applications after December 31, 2041, and before January 1, 2044.

(6) A physician’s eligibility pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the physician complying with all of the requirements set forth in this section.

(h) All applicable employment benefits, salary, and policies provided by nonprofit community health centers to their current employees shall be provided to medical practitioners from Mexico participating in
 this program. This shall include nonprofit community health centers providing malpractice insurance coverage.

(i) Each program applicant shall be responsible for working with the governments of Mexico and the United States in order to obtain the necessary three-year visa required for program participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 3.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2126.

(a) The following fees apply to the licensure of physicians and surgeons authorized by this article:

(1) The application and processing fee shall be the amount specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2435.

(2) The initial license fee shall be one and one-half times the amount specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2435.

(3) The fee for the Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System (CURES) shall be three times the annual fee specified under subdivision (a) of Section 208.

(4) The fee for the Steven M. Thompson Physician Corps Loan
 Repayment Program shall be one-and one-half times the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2436.5.

(b) The fees required by this section shall be deposited into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California, except that the fee described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be deposited into the CURES Fund.

(c) Any unencumbered funds collected by the board pursuant to former Section 853 shall be deposited into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 246, Sec. 4.   (AB 2860)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Reciprocity and National Board Diplomate Applications [2135. - 2153.]

2135.

The board shall issue a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant holds an unlimited license as a physician and surgeon in another state or states, or in a Canadian province or Canadian provinces, which was issued upon:

(1) Successful completion of a resident course of professional instruction leading to a degree of medical doctor from a board-approved medical school pursuant to Section 2084.

(2) Taking and passing a written examination that is recognized by the board to be equivalent in content to that administered in California.

(b) The applicant has held an unrestricted license to practice medicine, in a state or states, in a Canadian province or Canadian provinces, or as a member of the active military, United States Public Health Services, or other federal program, for a period of at least four years. Any time spent by the applicant in an approved postgraduate training program or clinical fellowship acceptable to the board shall not be included in the calculation of this four-year period.

(c) The board determines that no disciplinary action has been taken against the applicant by any medical licensing authority and that the applicant has not been the subject of adverse judgments or settlements resulting from the practice of medicine that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of negligence or incompetence.

(d) The applicant (1)
 has satisfactorily completed at least one year of approved postgraduate training and is certified by a specialty board approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties or approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 651, (2) has satisfactorily completed at least two years of approved postgraduate training, or (3) has satisfactorily completed at least one year of approved postgraduate training and takes and passes the clinical competency written examination.

(e) The applicant has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a certificate under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220).

(f) Any application received from an applicant who has held an unrestricted license to practice medicine, in a state or states, or Canadian province or Canadian provinces, or as a member of the active military,
 United States Public Health Services, or other federal program for four or more years shall be reviewed and processed pursuant to this section. Any time spent by the applicant in an approved postgraduate training program or clinical fellowship acceptable to the board shall not be included in the calculation of this four-year period. This subdivision does not apply to applications that may be reviewed and processed pursuant to Section 2151.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 64) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 6.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2135.5.

Upon review and recommendation, the board may determine that an applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate has satisfied the medical education requirements of Sections 2084 and 2135 and the examination requirements of Section 2170 if the applicant meets all of the following criteria:

(a) They hold an unlimited and unrestricted license as a physician and surgeon in another state and has held that license continuously for a minimum of four years prior to the date of application.

(b) They meet the postgraduate training requirements in Section 2096 and are certified by a specialty board that is a member board of the American Board of
 Medical Specialties.

(c) They are not subject to denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220).

(d) They have not been the subject of a disciplinary action by a medical licensing authority or of an adverse judgment or settlement resulting from the practice of medicine that, as determined by the board, constitutes a pattern of negligence or incompetence.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 17.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2141.

(a) An applicant under this article shall file a verified application on a form furnished by the Division of Licensing.

(b) Each application shall include all of the following:

(1) A list of each license to practice medicine issued by a medical licensing authority to the applicant with the date each certificate or license was issued and a description of each certificate or license. The division in its discretion may require the applicant to file an indicia of each certification or licensure. If a certificate or license has been lost, a copy may be filed together with proof satisfactory to the division that the copy is a correct one and that the certificate was issued to the applicant without fraud or misrepresentation.

(2) A list of each medical school or college at which the applicant undertook his or her resident course of professional instruction and all postsecondary educational institutions from which the applicant was graduated, including the period of study at each.

(3) Other information as may be required by the division.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by the reciprocity application fee required in Section 2435.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1176, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2143.

An applicant for a reciprocity certificate need not have completed the postgraduate training required in Section 2096 prior to the issuance of a license in another state, if the applicant complies with the requirements of Section 2096 before application is made to the board for a reciprocity certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 68.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2144.

The Division of Licensing may make an independent investigation of the educational qualifications and the ability and standing of the applicant.

If, after this investigation and any other or further examination or investigation which the division may see fit to make on its own part, it is found that the applicant does not meet the requirements for licensure as a physician and surgeon under this chapter, then the division may deny licensure under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 23.6.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2151.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Division of Licensing may issue a physician and surgeon’s certificate to a diplomate of the National Board of Medical Examiners provided the following requirements are met:

(a) The standard of the National Board of Medical Examiners on the date the diplomate certificate was issued was in no degree or particular less than that which was required for a physician and surgeon’s certificate under this chapter on the same date.

(b) The applicant shall file an application with the division as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 2080). The applicant shall not, however, be required to comply with any provision of that article which is inconsistent with or in conflict with the provisions of this section.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by the fee required in Section 2435.

(d) The applicant shall satisfy the division that the diplomate certificate was procured without fraud or misrepresentation.

(e) The applicant shall not have committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a certificate under Section 480 or Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 736, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2153.

In addition to the requirements of Section 164, a certificate issued under this article shall include in its description the basis upon which the certificate was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Osteopathic Reciprocity Applications [2153.5. - 2153.5.]

2153.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall issue an osteopathic physician’s and surgeon’s certificate on reciprocity to an applicant providing he or she meets the following requirements:

(a) The applicant holds an unlimited license to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine in another state whose written licensing examination is recognized and approved by the board to be equivalent in content to that administered in California. For the purposes of this section, the board may recognize and approve as equivalent, along with other examinations, an examination prepared by the Federation of State Medical Boards if an applicant had been licensed in another state as a result of the successful completion, prior to December 31, 1993, of that examination. In lieu of a board recognized and approved state written license examination, the board may require the applicant to successfully complete a special examination in general medicine and osteopathic principles prepared by the National Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners, or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. The board may also utilize a special purpose examination prepared by the Federation of State Medical Boards.

(b) The board determines that no disciplinary action has been taken against the applicant by any medical licensing authority and that the applicant has not been the subject of adverse judgments or settlements resulting from the practice of medicine that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of negligence or incompetence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 789, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Special Permits [2168. - 2169.]

2168.

(a) (1) A special faculty permit authorizes the holder to practice medicine only within the medical school itself, any affiliated institution of the medical school, or an academic medical center and any affiliated institution in which the permitholder is providing instruction as part of the medical school’s or academic medical center’s educational program and for which the medical school or academic medical center has assumed direct responsibility. The holder of a special faculty permit shall not engage in the practice of medicine except as provided above.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the term “academic medical center” is defined as meeting all of the following
 requirements:

(A) A facility licensed by the State of California.

(B) The facility conducts both internal and external peer review of the faculty for the purpose of conferral of academic appointments on an ongoing basis.

(C) The facility conducts clinical and basic research for the purpose of advancing patient care.

(D) The facility meets either of the following:

(i) The facility trains a minimum of 250 resident physicians in Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education accredited residencies on an annual basis commencing each January 1.

(ii) The facility is a National Cancer Institute-designated comprehensive cancer center that trains a minimum of 25 resident or fellow physicians in Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education accredited residencies on an annual basis commencing each January 1.

(E) The facility has more than 100 research students or postdoctoral researchers annually.

(F) The facility has
 foreign medical graduates in research.

(G) The facility offers clinical observer experiences.

(H) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the facility is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges and the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education. 

(ii) The facility is a National Cancer Institute-designated comprehensive cancer center that is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.

(b) Time spent in a faculty position under a special faculty permit shall not be counted toward the postgraduate training required for licensure and shall not qualify the holder of the permit for waiver of any
 written examination required for licensure.

(c) The medical school or academic medical center shall not appoint the holder of a special faculty permit to a position as a division chief or head of a department without express written authorization from the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (SB 387)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.1.

(a) Any person who meets all of the following eligibility requirements may apply for a special faculty permit:

(1) Is academically eminent. For purposes of this article, “academically eminent” means the applicant meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The person holds or has been offered a full-time appointment at the level of full professor in a tenure track position, or its equivalent, at an academic medical center, as defined in Section 2168, or a California medical school approved by the board.

(B) The person is clearly outstanding in a specific field of medicine or surgery and has been offered by the dean of a medical
 school or the dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center a full-time academic appointment at the level of full professor or associate professor, and a great need exists to fill that position.

(2) Possesses a current valid license to practice medicine issued by another state, country, or other jurisdiction.

(3) Is not subject to denial under Section 480 or any provision of this chapter.

(4) Pays the fee prescribed for application for, and initial licensure as, a physician and surgeon.

(5) Has not held a position under Section 2113 for a period of two years or more preceding the date of the application. The board may, in its discretion, waive this requirement.

(b) The board
 shall exercise its discretion in determining whether an applicant satisfies the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The board shall establish a review committee composed of two members of the division, one of whom shall be a physician and surgeon and one of whom shall be a public member, one representative from each of the medical schools, and one individual selected pursuant to paragraph (3) to represent academic medical centers in California. The committee shall review and make recommendations to the board regarding the applicants applying pursuant to this section, including those applicants that a medical school or academic medical center proposes to appoint as a division chief or head of a department or as nontenure track faculty.

(2) The representative of the medical school or academic medical center offering the applicant an
 academic appointment shall not participate in any vote on the recommendation to the board for that applicant.

(3) The academic medical centers shall select by consensus, one individual to represent academic medical centers on the review committee. The individual shall be from a facility that meets the criteria in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2168.

(d) The board shall not approve more than five applications submitted pursuant to this section by each academic medical
 center in any calendar year.

(e) As used in this section, “academic medical center” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2168.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (SB 387)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.2.

An application for a special faculty permit shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and shall include any information that the board may prescribe to establish an applicant’s eligibility for a permit. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A statement from the dean of the medical school or dean or chief medical officer at an academic medical center at which the applicant will be employed describing the applicant’s qualifications and justifying the dean’s or chief medical officer’s determination that the applicant satisfies the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2168.1.

(b) A statement by the dean of the medical school or dean or chief medical officer
 of the academic medical center listing every affiliated institution in which the applicant will be providing instruction as part of the medical school’s or academic medical center’s educational program and justifying any clinical activities at each of the institutions listed by the dean or chief medical officer.

(c) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for special faculty permits, as defined by Section 2168, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether
 the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 8.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.3.

A special faculty permit may be denied, suspended, or revoked for any violation that would be grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a physician and surgeon’s certificate, or for violation of any provision of this article. The holder of a special faculty permit shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter applicable to the holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.4.

(a) A special faculty permit expires and becomes invalid at midnight on the last day of the month in which the permit was issued during the second year of a two-year term commencing from the date of issuance, if not renewed.

(b) A person who holds a special faculty permit shall show at the time of license renewal that they continue to meet the eligibility criteria set forth in Section 2168.1. After the first renewal of a special faculty permit, the permitholder shall not be required to hold a full-time faculty position, and may instead be employed part-time in a position that otherwise meets the requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2168.1.

(c) A person who holds a
 special faculty permit shall show at the time of license renewal that they meet the continuing medical education requirements of Article 10 (commencing with Section 2190).

(d) In addition to the requirements set forth above, a special faculty permit shall be renewed in accordance with Article 19 (commencing with Section 2420) in the same manner as a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.

(e) Those fees applicable to a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall also apply to a special faculty permit and shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 15.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.5.

A holder of a special faculty permit issued before January 1, 2021, who practices medicine pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2168 at an academic medical center, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2168, shall be deemed to hold a special faculty permit with that academic medical center as though the initial application had been sponsored by the academic medical center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 280, Sec. 6.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2169.

A person who holds a special faculty permit shall meet the continuing medical education requirements set forth in Article 10 (commencing with Section 2190).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 18.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Examinations [2170. - 2186.]

2170.

(a) All applicants for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall take the examination provided for in this article unless provisions of this chapter otherwise provide.

(b) The provisions of this article shall apply to all examinations administered by the Division of Licensing unless provisions of this chapter otherwise provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2171.

All examinations shall be designed to ascertain the applicant’s fitness to practice medicine. Unless otherwise provided the examination shall be in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 983, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2175.

State examination records shall be kept on file by the board until June 1, 2070. Examinees shall be known and designated by number only, and the name attached to the number shall be kept secret until the examinee is sent notification of the results of the examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 22.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2176.

Examinations for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate may be conducted by the Division of Licensing under a uniform examination system, and for that purpose the division may make such arrangements with organizations furnishing examination material as it may deem desirable.
